Arkansas, session 2025, SB586.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. TITLE. This act shall be known and may be cited as the
"Protect Our Constitution Act".

SECTION 2. Pursuant to the authority granted by Arkansas Constitution,
Article 5, § 1, the subsection of Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 1,
titled "Majority" is amended to read as follows:
Majority. (a)(1) Any Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this
section, any measure submitted to the people as herein provided shall take
effect and become a law when approved by a majority of the votes cast upon
such measure, and not otherwise, and shall not be required to receive a
majority of the electors voting at such election.
*MBM035*
03/27/2025 4:09:02 PM MBM035

SB586
(2) A constitutional amendment submitted to the people as herein
provided shall take effect and become a law when approved by at least two-
thirds (2/3) of the votes cast upon such measure.
(b) Such measures After a measure has been approved by a vote of the
people, it shall be operative on and after the thirtieth day after the
election at which it is approved, unless otherwise specified in the Act
measure.
(c) This section shall not be construed to deprive any member of the
General Assembly of the right to introduce any measure, but no measure shall
be submitted to the people by the General Assembly, except a proposed
constitutional amendment or amendments as provided for in this Constitution.

SECTION 3. Pursuant to the authority granted by Arkansas Constitution,
Article 5, § 1, the subsection of Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 1,
titled "Conflicting Measures", is amended to read as follows:
Conflicting Measures. If conflicting measures initiated or referred to
the people shall be approved by a majority of the votes severally cast for
and against the same as herein provided at the same election, the one
receiving the highest number of affirmative votes shall become law.

SECTION 4. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that amendments to the Arkansas
Constitution impact the public peace, health, and safety of each citizen of
this state; that to protect the public peace, health, and safety of the
citizens of this state, it is necessary to increase the threshold for passage
of a constitutional amendment proposed under Arkansas Constitution, Article
5, § 1, to ensure that constitutional amendments are supported by an
appropriate number of voters to justify an amendment to the Arkansas
Constitution; and that this act should become effective at the earliest
opportunity to ensure that its provisions are in place for the 2026 general
election. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being
immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and
safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
03/27/2025 4:09:02 PM MBM035

SB586
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

































03/27/2025 4:09:02 PM MBM035